Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2985.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Water rights; allocation Within one hundred twenty days after the effective date of this act, the state land department shall initiate a public stakeholder process to adopt a procedure for allocating central Arizona project water that is currently allocated to the state land department pursuant to the United States secretary of the interior's final allocation of central Arizona project water dated January 10, 1983 to parcels of state trust land that may be sold or leased.